Utah statutes.
65A-8-204.   Wildland Fire Suppression Fund created.

(1)  There is created a private-purpose trust fund known as the "Wildland Fire Suppression Fund."

(2)  The fund shall be administered by the division to pay fire suppression and presuppression costs on eligible lands within unincorporated areas of counties.

(3)  The contents of the fund shall include:

(a)  payments by counties pursuant to written agreements made under Section 65A-8-205;

(b)  interest and earnings from the investment of fund money; and

(c)  money appropriated by the Legislature.

(4)  Fund money shall be invested by the state treasurer with the earnings and interest accruing to the fund.

(5) (a)  A maximum level of $8,000,000 is established for the fund.

(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(b)(ii), if the amount of money in the fund equals or exceeds $8,000,000 on March 31, no assessments may be charged for the following year.

(ii)  The waiver of assessments provided in Subsection (5)(b)(i) does not apply to any equity payment required by Section 65A-8-205.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 136, 2007 General Session

